New York, session 2025-2026, A3963.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of schedule IV of section 3306 of the 2 public health law is amended by adding a new paragraph 54 to read as 3 follows: 4 (54) Suvorexant. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 6 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07509-01-5